Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
ARTICLE 130
AMENDMENT OF ARTICLES OF
INCORPORATION AND BYLAWS

Cross references:

For definitions applicable to this article, see §§ 7-90-102 and 7-121-401.

Section

PART 1 AMENDMENT OF ARTICLES
OF INCORPORATION

PART 2 AMENDMENT OF BYLAWS

PART 3 APPROVAL BY THIRD PERSONS AND TERMINATING MEMBERS OR REDEEMING OR CANCELING MEMBERSHIPS